Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 12

Crop Liens

66-12-101. Landlord's lien for rent.

A landlord and one controlling land by lease or otherwise shall have a lien on all crops grown on the land during the year for the payment of the rent for the year, whether the contract of rental be verbal or in writing, and this lien shall inure to the benefit of the assignee of the lienor.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 5299a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8017; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1201.

Cross-References. Leases, §§66-7-101,66-7-102.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, §§ 13, 14.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutionality of Prejudgment Seizure of Property Under Tennessee Law (Roger W. Dickson), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 575 (1971).

The New Article 9: Its Impact on Tennessee Law (Part II), 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 329 (2000).

66-12-102. Lien for goods and money supplied.

A landlord and one controlling land by lease or otherwise shall have a like lien on all crops of tenants or sharecroppers, grown during the year on the land, for the payment of necessary food, household fuel, money and clothing supplied during the year to such tenant or sharecropper or those dependent upon such tenant or sharecropper.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 5299a2; mod. Code 1932, § 8018; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 13 Tenn. Juris., Frauds, Statute of, § 14; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

Collateral References.

Attachment, execution, or recovery of personal judgment as waiver of landlord's lien. 151 A.L.R. 679.

Chattel mortgage or conditional sales contract, landlord's acceptance of, as waiver of his lien or reservation of title. 96 A.L.R. 568.

Chattel mortgage, statutes in relation to, as applicable to provisions of lease purporting to give lessor lien on lessee's chattels. 64 A.L.R. 627.

Taxes or other expenditures which tenant has agreed to pay or make, landlord's lien for rent as including. 99 A.L.R. 1104.

Warehouse Receipts Act as affecting landlord's lien on property represented by receipts. 61 A.L.R. 952.

66-12-103. Lien for farm implements and supplies.

A landlord and one controlling land by lease or otherwise shall have a like lien on all crops of tenants or sharecroppers grown during the year on the land, for the payment of necessary fertilizer, implements, work stock, feed for stock, seed, labor and insecticide, furnished to and used by such tenants or sharecroppers in the production of the crops.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 5299a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8019; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 13 Tenn. Juris., Frauds, Statute of, § 14; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-104. Priority of landlord's liens.

The liens in §§66-12-101 —66-12-103 shall all be upon equality, but all shall be superior to all other encumbrances, lien, levy, or contract, on the crops, regardless of the date of such other encumbrance, lien, levy, or contract.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 5299a4; mod. Code 1932, § 8020; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1204.

Cross-References. Cotton ginner's lien, §66-15-101.

Execution levied on growing crop, §26-3-102.

Landlord's lien, §66-12-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6.

Collateral References.

Chattel mortgage, priority of landlord's lien as against. 37 A.L.R. 400, 52 A.L.R. 935.

66-12-105. Expiration of liens.

The liens shall expire and be barred after July 1, following the crop year, unless a proceeding for its enforcement be commenced before that date.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 5299a5; Code 1932, § 8021; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-106. Enforcement of liens.

All of the crop liens may be enforced in any court of competent jurisdiction, by original suit, execution and levy, or by original suit, attachment and garnishment, and all or any number of demands may be joined in one (1) suit or each established in a separate suit.

Before any proceeding shall be instituted for the enforcement of the lien, the lienholder shall itemize the lienholder's claim and, either personally or through an agent, make affidavit in the manner required by law, in which affidavit it shall be stated that the claim is correct, owing, unpaid, and bona fide, and not subject to any setoff or credit.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 5299a6; mod. Code 1932, § 8022; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, §§ 13, 14.

66-12-107. Liability of purchaser of crop.

A purchaser, with or without notice, of a crop subject to any of such liens shall be liable to the lienholder for the value of the crop, or any part of it, so purchased, not, however, to exceed the amount of rent due and/or supplies furnished and costs incurred in collecting same, if the crop, or part thereof, is delivered to or taken possession of by such purchaser before July 1 after the crop year; provided, the lienholder shall bring the action against the purchaser within one (1) year from the date of delivery to or possession taken by the latter.

Code 1858, § 3542 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 52, § 3); Acts 1879, ch. 72; Shan., § 5302; Acts 1921, ch. 42, § 1; 1923, ch. 71, § 7; Shan. Supp., §§ 5299a7, 5302; mod. Code 1932, § 8023; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 13 Tenn. Juris., Factors and Commission Merchants, § 8; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, § 10.

66-12-108. Liability of broker selling crop.

Any factor, broker, commission merchant, or other person who sells the crop of a tenant or sharecropper, or any portion of it, with or without notice of such lien, before its bar, and applies the proceeds to the payment of the tenant's indebtedness to such seller, shall be liable as a purchaser to the person entitled to the rent and/or amount due for supplies.

Acts 1899, ch. 22, § 1; Shan., § 5302a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8024; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1208.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 10 Tenn. Juris., Election of Remedies, § 2; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-109. Disposal of crop with intent to deprive landlord of lien.

If any person disposes of any crop or part thereof that is subject to any such landlord's lien, as provided in §§66-12-101 —66-12-112, with the purpose of depriving the owners of any such indebtedness of the same or its proceeds, such person commits a Class C misdemeanor, whether the person so offending had custody of the property at the time or not.

Acts 1897, ch. 114, § 1; Shan., § 5305a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8025; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1209; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 54; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-110. Criminal liability avoided by payment of claim.

If the person so disposing of the property shall pay over to the lienor or owner of the debt so secured the proceeds of the sale, or sufficient thereof to satisfy the lien, or in case the owner of the debt shall have received or recovered from the purchaser of the property the value thereof, then if the party so disposing of such property shall pay to the purchaser the proceeds of sale, and all costs of the prosecution accrued, and all before the person so disposing of such property is arraigned for trial, the person so disposing of such property shall not be so held liable.

Acts 1897, ch. 114, § 3; Shan., § 5305a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8026; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1210.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-111. Landlord's portion of crop unaffected.

Nothing in §§66-12-101 —66-12-112 shall affect the portion of the crop reserved as rent by the landlord of a sharecropper, or for the rent or use of land producing same, whether divided or undivided, it being the intention to treat the title to such portion of the crop as vested in the landlord, unless the contract expressly provides otherwise.

Acts 1923, ch. 71, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 5299a8; Acts 1927, ch. 33, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 8027; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1211.

Collateral References.

Chattel mortgage, landlord's acceptance of, as waiver of his reservation of title to crops. 96 A.L.R. 568.

Filing lease or contract which reserves title to crops in lessor, necessity of. 14 A.L.R. 1362.

Nursery stock attached to soil, as real or personal property. 125 A.L.R. 1411.

Stipulation of parties to cause as to legal rights of landlord and tenant in crops. 92 A.L.R. 672.

66-12-112. Joint payment by purchaser.

Should a tenant, by the consent and permission of the tenant's landlord, which consent and permission shall be in writing and signed by such landlord, sell the tenant's crop or any part thereof to any purchaser, upon which there exists a lien in favor of the landlord for either rent or supplies of any kind, the purchaser shall pay the purchase price for such crop to the tenant and landlord jointly, or the purchaser shall issue the check or other written instrument given in lieu of the money for such crop, payable to the landlord and tenant jointly, and before such check or other written instrument shall be cashed or paid, it shall have written or endorsed on the back thereof the genuine signature of the landlord in the landlord's own handwriting, or in the handwriting of the landlord's duly authorized agent or attorney.

Acts 1921, ch. 158, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 5302a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8028; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1212.

66-12-113. Laborer's lien on crops.

When any person shall perform any labor or render services to another in accordance with a contract, written or verbal, for cultivating the soil, and shall produce a crop, such person shall have a lien upon the crop produced, which shall be the results of such person's labor, for the payment of such compensation or wages as agreed upon in the contract.

Acts 1879, ch. 15, § 1; Shan., § 3567; mod. Code 1932, § 8014; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1213.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 10 Tenn. Juris., Employer and Employee, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

66-12-114. Duration of laborer's lien.

The lien provided for in §66-12-113 shall exist three (3) months from November 15 of the year in which the labor is performed; provided, that an account of such labor rendered be sworn to before some court of general sessions, or clerk of the court issuing the writ of attachment.

Acts 1879, ch. 15, § 2; Shan., § 3568; mod. Code 1932, § 8015; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1214.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority of Conditional Vendor's Lien Over Warehouseman's Lien, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 202 (1930).

66-12-115. Priority of landlord's lien.

The lien provided for in §66-12-113 shall not abridge or interfere with the landlord's lien for rent or supplies, but shall be second to the landlord's lien, and none other.

Acts 1879, ch. 15, § 3; Shan., § 3569; Code 1932, § 8016; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1215.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

Collateral References.

Landlord's distress for rent on goods subject to lien. 62 A.L.R. 1142.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority of Conditional Vendor's Lien Over Warehouseman's Lien, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 202 (1930).